Nevada, session 83, AB577.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State General
Fund to the State Department of Conservation and Natural
Resources the sum of $257,400 for the Conservation and Natural
Resources Administration budget account for a new website and
online database for the Sagebrush Ecosystem Technical Team.
Sec. 2. There is hereby appropriated from the State General
Fund to the State Department of Conservation and Natural
Resources the sum of $144,032 for the Conservation Districts
Program budget account for the replacement of vehicles.
Sec. 3. There is hereby appropriated from the State General
Fund to the Division of Water Resources of the State Department of
Conservation and Natural Resources the sum of $129,539 for the
replacement of vehicles.
Sec. 4. There is hereby appropriated from the State General
Fund to the Division of Water Resources of the State Department of
Conservation and Natural Resources the sum of $15,953 for the
replacement of computer hardware and associated software.
Sec. 5. Any remaining balance of the appropriations made by
sections 1 to 4, inclusive, of this act must not be committed for
expenditure after June 30, 2027, by the entity to which the
appropriation is made or any entity to which money from the
appropriation is granted or otherwise transferred in any manner, and
any portion of the appropriated money remaining must not be spent
for any purpose after September 17, 2027, by either the entity to
which the money was appropriated or the entity to which the money
was subsequently granted or transferred, and must be reverted to the
State General Fund on or before September 17, 2027.
Sec. 6. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)